Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1020
Electrologist, defined.

Electrologist means a person who engages in the practice of electrolysis for permanent hair removal.

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-356.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 282.